Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1370.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 402(c) of the act of June 22, 1937 (P.L.1987, No.394), known as The Clean Streams Law, is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 402. Potential Pollution.--* * *(c) * * *12345678910111213141516171819202122232425 (3) A construction site for the purpose of building a single-family, residential home shall be exempt from the otherwise applicable requirements for a National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System permit.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1370PN1566 - 2 - 12345